Utah statutes.
48-1-45 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Name of registered limited liability partnership.

The name of a limited liability partnership shall contain the words "limited liability partnership" or the abbreviations "L.L.P." or "LLP" as the last words or letters of its name.

